Missouri, session 2026, HB2910.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 701, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 701.455, to read as follows:
701.455. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Diaper changing station", a table or other device suitable for changing the
diaper of a child under four years of age;
(2) "Political subdivision", any municipality, school district, special district,
local governmental body, county, city, town, or village;
(3) "Public building", a building owned or operated by this state or an agency or
political subdivision of this state;
(4) "Public restroom":
(a) A restroom within a public building that is open for public use; or
(b) A restroom within a private business that is open for use by members of the
general public patronizing the business;
(5) "Restroom", a room that contains one or more toilets or urinals.
2. Any new private business established on or after August 28, 2026, shall equip
each public restroom it owns or operates with a diaper changing station.
3. Beginning January 1, 2028, each public restroom within a public building
shall be equipped with a diaper changing station.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2910 2
4. If a public restroom required to be equipped with a diaper changing station
under this section is restricted to persons of a specific gender, another public restroom
equipped with a diaper changing station within the same building shall be available to
persons of the opposite gender.
✔